Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4807
Supreme Court Administrator; duties.

(1) The State Court Administrator shall compile information on the number of veterans receiving, successfully completing, declining, and denied participation in a veteran justice program and the sentencing mitigation described in section 29-4805.

(2) The State Court Administrator shall track outcomes among veterans who participate in a veteran justice program, including completion status, recidivism, and housing and employment status.

(3) Data collected under this section shall be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, age, military discharge characterization, and the offense involved.

(4) On or before July 1, 2028, and on or before each July 1 thereafter, the State Court Administrator shall electronically submit a report to the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature. The report shall contain de-identified data collected pursuant to this section and shall analyze the outcomes, successes, and areas for improvement of the veteran justice programs and the sentencing mitigation described in section 29-4805.

Laws 2024, LB253, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 42.
Sections 29-4801 to 29-4807 apply on and after July 1, 2027.